District of Columbia statutes.
16-4428

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 29 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).